Utah statutes.
41-1a-1102.   Storage -- Establishing ownership.

(1)  The division may store a seized vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor in a public or private garage, state impound lot, or other approved storage facility until the vehicle's, vessel's, or outboard motor's registration has been properly completed and the appropriate fees have been paid or until the ownership of the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor is established to the satisfaction of the division.

(2)  If the identification number has been defaced, altered, or obliterated, the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor may not be released until the identification number has been replaced or until a new number assigned by the division has been provided and has been affixed to the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 1, 1992 General Session

